Washington statutes.
RCW 36.47.030

State association of county officials may be coordinating agency.

The county officials enumerated in RCW 36.47.020 are empowered to designate the Washington state association of county officials as a coordinating agency through which the duties imposed by RCW 36.47.020 may be performed, harmonized, or correlated.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 5 s 2; 1963 c 4 s 36.47.030. Prior: 1959 c 130 s 3.]